Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201444-3812
Corporation; articles of incorporation;
requirements.

(1) Two or more persons may organize a prepaid
dental service corporation under this section.

(2) The articles of incorporation of the corporation shall conform to
the requirements of the Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act or to the requirements
of the Nebraska Model
Business Corporation Act, except that:

(a) The name of the corporation shall indicate that dental services
are to be provided;

(b) The purposes of the corporation shall be limited to providing dental
services and business reasonably related thereto;

(c) The articles shall state whether members, shareholders, or providers
of services may be required to share operating deficits, either through assessments
or through reductions in compensation for services rendered, the general conditions
and procedures for deficit sharing, and any limits on the amount of the deficit
to be assumed by each individual member, shareholder, or provider;

(d) For corporations having members, the articles shall state the conditions
and procedures for acquiring membership and that only members have the right
to vote; and

(e) For corporations not having members, the articles shall state how
the directors are to be selected.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 12;

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 226;

Laws 1996, LB 681, § 196;

Laws 2014, LB749, § 292.
January 1, 2016
Nebraska Model Business Corporation Act, see section 21-201.

Nebraska Nonprofit Corporation Act, see section 21-1901.